Utah statutes.
4-40-102.   Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account -- Interest -- Use of contributions and interest.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account.

(2)  The account shall be funded by contributions deposited into the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account in accordance with Section 59-10-1310.

(3) (a)  The Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account shall earn interest.

(b)  Interest earned on the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account shall be deposited into the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account.

(4)  The Department of Agriculture shall distribute contributions and interest deposited into the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account to one or more organizations that:

(a)  are exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code; or

(b)  operate as a city or county animal shelter.

(5) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (4) may apply to the department to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (4).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the department in accordance with Subsection (4):

(i)  shall expend the distribution only to spay or neuter dogs and cats:

(A)  owned by persons having low incomes; and

(B)  by veterinarians who are licensed by Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act; and

(ii)  may not expend the distribution for any administrative cost relating to an expenditure authorized by Subsection (5)(b)(i).

(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules:

(i)  providing procedures and requirements for an organization to apply to the department to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (4); and

(ii)  to define what constitutes a person having a low income.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 124, 2011 General Session

